Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 6. RECORDS

SUBTITLE B. COUNTY RECORDS

CHAPTER 195. ELECTRONIC FILING OF RECORDS WITH AND RECORDING BY COUNTY CLERK

Sec. 195.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Commission" means the Texas State Library and Archives Commission.

(2) "Director and librarian" means the executive and administrative officer of the Texas State Library and Archives Commission.

(3) "Electronic document" has the meaning assigned by Section 15.002, Property Code.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 58, Sec. 2, eff. May 10, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 699 (S.B. 335), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 195.002. ADOPTION OF RULES. (a) The commission shall adopt rules by which a county clerk may accept electronic documents and other instruments by electronic filing and record electronic documents and other instruments electronically under Section 191.009.

(b) The rules must provide for:

(1) the electronic filing with and recording by the county clerk of:

(A) real property records; and

(B) except for records maintained under Section 192.006, other instruments filed with and recorded by the county clerk as determined by the commission;

(2) the means by which an electronic document or other instrument may be electronically transmitted to a county clerk for filing;

(3) the means by which a county clerk may electronically record an electronic document or other instrument filed electronically;

(4) requiring that the means adopted under Subdivision (2) or (3) be generally available, nonproprietary technology; and

(5) security standards to prevent the filing and recording of fraudulent electronic documents or other instruments or alteration of electronic documents or other instruments that were previously filed and recorded electronically.

(c) Rules adopted by the commission under this section that permit the use of digital signatures in the electronic filing of electronic documents or other instruments with the county clerk must be, to the extent practicable, consistent with rules governing digital signatures adopted by the Department of Information Resources under Section 2054.060, Government Code.

(d) Before adopting or amending a rule under this section, the commission shall consider the recommendations of the Electronic Recording Advisory Committee established under Section 195.008.

(e) Notwithstanding Sections 322.017 and 322.018, Business & Commerce Code, a county clerk may accept any filed electronic record, as defined by Section 322.002, Business & Commerce Code, or electronic document and may electronically record that electronic document or record if the filing and recording of that electronic document or record complies with rules adopted by the commission under this section.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 58, Sec. 2, eff. May 10, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 702, Sec. 3, eff. January 1, 2002.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 699 (S.B. 335), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 2.24, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 195.003. PERSONS AUTHORIZED TO FILE ELECTRONICALLY. (a) The following persons may file electronic documents or other documents electronically for recording with a county clerk that accepts electronic filing and recording under this chapter:

(1) an attorney licensed in this state;

(2) a bank, savings and loan association, savings bank, or credit union doing business under laws of the United States or this state;

(3) a federally chartered lending institution, a federal government-sponsored entity, an instrumentality of the federal government, or a person approved as a mortgagee by the United States to make federally insured loans;

(4) a person licensed to make regulated loans in this state;

(5) a title insurance company or title insurance agent licensed to do business in this state;

(6) an agency of this state; or

(7) a municipal clerk.

(a-1) In addition to persons listed under Subsection (a), a county may authorize a person to file electronic documents or other documents electronically for recording with a county clerk if the county enters into a memorandum of understanding with the person for that purpose. This subsection applies only to a county with a population of 500,000 or more.

(b) A fee may not be charged to a person authorized to file under this section, except as provided by Section 195.006 or 195.007.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 58, Sec. 2, eff. May 10, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 699 (S.B. 335), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1260 (H.B. 2048), Sec. 21, eff. June 18, 2005.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 793 (S.B. 1437), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 195.004. NOTICE OF CONFIRMATION. (a) A county clerk that accepts electronic filing and recording under this chapter shall confirm or reject an electronic filing of an electronic document or other instrument not later than the first business day after the date the electronic document or other instrument is filed. Notice under this section must be made:

(1) by electronic means if possible; or

(2) if notice under Subdivision (1) is not possible, by telephone or electronic facsimile machine.

(b) If the county clerk fails to provide notice of rejection within the time provided by Subsection (a), the electronic document or other instrument is considered accepted for filing and may not subsequently be rejected.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 58, Sec. 2, eff. May 10, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 699 (S.B. 335), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 195.005. TIME ELECTRONIC DOCUMENT OR OTHER INSTRUMENT CONSIDERED FILED OR RECORDED. An electronic document or other instrument that is recorded electronically under this chapter is considered to be recorded in compliance with a law relating to the recording of electronic documents or other instruments as of the county clerk's business day on which the electronic document or other instrument is filed electronically. An electronic document or other instrument filed electronically under this chapter must be recorded as timely as an instrument filed by any other means.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 58, Sec. 2, eff. May 10, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 699 (S.B. 335), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 195.006. ADDITIONAL FEE PROHIBITED. The fee to file or record an electronic document or other instrument electronically under this chapter is the same as the fee for filing or recording the instrument by other means, and a county clerk may not charge an additional fee for filing or recording an electronic document or other instrument electronically under this chapter.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 58, Sec. 2, eff. May 10, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 699 (S.B. 335), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 195.007. ACCESS TO ELECTRONIC DOCUMENT OR OTHER INSTRUMENT RECORDED ELECTRONICALLY. (a) An electronic document or other instrument filed or recorded electronically must be available for public inspection in the same manner and at the same time as an instrument filed or recorded by other means.

(b) The county clerk shall provide a requestor, as defined by Section 552.003, Government Code, of an electronic document or other instrument filed or recorded electronically under this chapter with electronic copies of the electronic document or other instrument in a form that is capable of being processed by the use of technology that is generally available and nonproprietary in nature. The county clerk shall provide the copies to the requestor at the cost of producing the copies in accordance with Section 552.262, Government Code.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 58, Sec. 2, eff. May 10, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 699 (S.B. 335), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 195.008. ELECTRONIC RECORDING ADVISORY COMMITTEE. (a) The Electronic Recording Advisory Committee shall be appointed as required by this section to recommend to the commission initial and subsequent rules to be adopted under this chapter.

(b) The committee consists of:

(1) the following persons appointed by the director and librarian:

(A) one person who is employed by or is an officer of a title insurance agent or title insurance company;

(B) an officer or employee of a federal government-sponsored entity;

(C) a person who as a usual business practice obtains copies of recorded instruments from a county clerk to maintain an abstract or title plant; and

(D) a public representative;

(2) two persons who are county judges or county commissioners appointed by the County Judges and Commissioners Association of Texas;

(3) four county clerks appointed by the County and District Clerks' Association of Texas;

(4) three persons who are employed by or officers of different title insurance agents or companies appointed by the Texas Land Title Association;

(5) the presiding officer of the Title Insurance Subcommittee of the Real Estate, Probate, and Trust Law section of the State Bar of Texas or the functional equivalent of that subcommittee;

(6) the attorney general or a person designated by the attorney general;

(7) the comptroller or a person designated by the comptroller;

(8) the executive director of the Texas Facilities Commission or a person designated by the executive director;

(9) the executive director of the Department of Information Resources or a person designated by the executive director; and

(10) the director and librarian or a person designated by the director and librarian, who also serves as presiding officer of the committee.

(c) A member of the committee serves a term of two years that expires on August 31 of each odd-numbered year.

(d) A vacancy in the membership of the committee is filled in the same manner as the initial appointment and is for the remainder of the unexpired term.

(e) A meeting of the committee is at the call of the presiding officer and is subject to Chapter 551, Government Code.

(f) A member of the committee is not entitled to compensation or reimbursement of expenses from the commission for serving on the committee. A member of the committee who is an employee or officer of a state agency is entitled to compensation and reimbursement of expenses for service on the committee as determined by the state agency of which the member is an officer or employee. Chapter 2110, Government Code, does not apply to the committee.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 58, Sec. 2, eff. May 10, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1071 (H.B. 1524), Sec. 123, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 195.009. FILING. For purposes of this chapter, an electronic document or other instrument is filed with the county clerk when it is received by the county clerk, unless the county clerk rejects the filing within the time and manner provided by this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 702, Sec. 4, eff. January 1, 2002.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 699 (S.B. 335), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2005.